Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 3. United States Military Reservations

§ 19-7-301.
Jurisdiction of United States over certain military reservations.

Exclusive jurisdiction is ceded to the United States over all the territory owned by the United States within the limits of the United States military reservations known as Fort Francis E. Warren, Fort Washakie, Camp Sheridan, Camp Pilot Butte, and the United States powder depot at Cheyenne, together with such other lands in the state as are now or hereafter acquired or held by the United States for military purposes, either as additions to the posts above named or as new military posts or reservations, established for the common defense.

There is hereby ceded to the United States of America the following described lands belonging to the state of Wyoming, to-wit: The west half (W1/2) of section sixteen (16) and the east half of the northeast quarter (E1/2NE1/4), and the northeast quarter of the southeast quarter (NE1/4SE1/4) of section seventeen (17), in township fifty-six (56) north of range eighty-four (84) west of the sixth principal meridian in the county of Sheridan, and state of Wyoming, the same to be used for public military purposes by the United States of America.

There is hereby ceded to the United States of America the following described lands belonging to the state of Wyoming, to-wit: The east half (E1/2) of section sixteen (16) in township fifty-six (56) north of range eighty-four (84) west of the sixth principal meridian in the county of Sheridan and state of Wyoming, the same to be used for public military purposes by the United States of America.

There is hereby ceded to the United States of America the following described lands belonging to the state of Wyoming, and situated in Sheridan county, to-wit: Commencing at a point four hundred twenty-eight (428) feet south of the one-half (1/2) section corner between sections ten (10) and fifteen (15) in township fifty-three (53) north of range eighty-three (83) west of sixth p.m.; thence east three hundred and thirty (330) feet; thence south one hundred (100) feet; thence west three hundred and thirty (330) feet; thence north one hundred (100) feet to the place of beginning; containing three-fourths (3/4) of one (1) acre, more or less; the same to be used as a site for the erection of a monument to the memory of the soldiers who fought in the Fort Phil Kearney massacre.

There is hereby ceded to the United States of America the following described lands belonging to the state of Wyoming, to-wit: The northeast quarter (NE1/4) and northwest quarter southeast quarter (NW1/4SE1/4) of section eighteen (18) in township of fifty-six (56) north, of range eighty-four (84) west of the sixth principal meridian, in the county of Sheridan and state of Wyoming, the same to be used for public military purposes by the United States of America.

Exclusive jurisdiction is ceded to the United States of America over and within the territory described by this section, saving, however, to this state:

The right to serve civil and criminal process within the territory in suits or prosecutions for, or on account of rights acquired, obligations incurred, or crimes committed in this state, but outside of the cession;

The right to tax persons and corporations, their franchises and property in the territory herein ceded pursuant to subsections (a), (b), (c) and (e) of this section;

All rights appertaining to any irrigation ditch or ditches crossing the lands ceded pursuant to subsections (c) and (e) of this section.

History.

Laws 1893, ch. 20, § 1; 1899, ch. 24, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 978, 2661; Laws 1901, ch. 30, § 1; 1903, ch. 45, § 1; 1905, ch. 80, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1910, §§ 701, 703, 705, 707, 709, 710; 1920, §§ 814, 816, 818, 820, 822, 823; R.S. 1931, §§ 118-105, 118-106, 118-108, 118-110, 118-112, 118-113; C.S. 1945, §§ 30-601, 30-602, 30-604, 30-606, 30-608, 30-609; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-90, 19-91, 19-93, 19-95, 19-97, 19-98; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-4-101

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to United States lands generally, see §§

36-10-101

to

36-10-105

.

Taxation of property. —

Cattle and horses belonging to a post and Indian trader, kept on an Indian reservation, are not exempt from state taxation because of his character as such trader; and fact that such property is on the reservation with consent of the Indians, whom he pays for the privilege, does not render it exempt from taxation. Moore v. Beason, 7 Wyo. 292, 51 P. 875,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1898).

Ceded military area. —

The provisions of this section remain in force after cession of area to United States, congress having failed to adopt superseding legislation. Danielson v. Donmopray, 57 F.2d 565, 1932 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1134 (D. Wyo. 1932).

Jurisdiction of state courts. —

State courts have jurisdiction of action for wrongful death occurring within federal military reservation ceded to Danielson v. Donmopray, 57 F.2d 565, 1932 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1134 (D. Wyo. 1932).

Wrongful death action. —

Action for wrongful death under a law enacted prior to ceding jurisdiction on a military reservation is applicable on said reservation. Danielson v. Donmopray, 57 F.2d 565, 1932 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1134 (D. Wyo. 1932).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Engle Act and Military Land Withdrawals: A Blueprint for Inter-Agency Cooperation,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 461 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

State voting rights of residents of federal military establishment, 34 ALR2d 1193.

Validity, construction, and application of 18 U.S.C. § 1382, prohibiting trespass on military installation, 12 ALR Fed 638.

Construction and application of 18 U.S.C. § 3238 relating to venue in cases of federal criminal offenses committed outside jurisdiction of any state or district, 24 ALR Fed 365.